District of Columbia statutes.
34-2401.24

Unauthorized opening of mains or pipes.

No person, unless by consent of the Chief of Engineers, shall tap or open the mains or pipes laid or hereafter to be laid by the United States, under a penalty of not less than $50 nor more than $500.

History

R.S., U.S., § 1803
Feb. 26, 1925, 43 Stat. 983, ch. 339, § 3

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-1550.
1973 Ed., § 43-1538.